Utah statutes.
11-13-222.   Officers and employees performing services under agreements.
(1)  Each officer and employee performing services for two or more public
agencies under an agreement under this chapter shall be considered to be:
(a)  an officer or employee of the public agency employing the officer or
employee's services even though the officer or employee performs those
functions outside of the territorial limits of any one of the contracting
public agencies; and
(b)  an officer or employee of the public agencies under the provisions of
Title 63G, Chapter 7, Governmental Immunity Act of Utah.
(2)  Unless otherwise provided in an agreement that creates an interlocal
entity, each employee of a public agency that is a party to the agreement
shall:
(a)  remain an employee of that public agency, even though assigned to perform
services for another public agency under the agreement; and
(b)  continue to be governed by the rules, rights, entitlements, and status
that apply to an employee of that public agency.
(3)  All of the privileges, immunities from liability, exemptions from laws,
ordinances, and rules, pensions and relief, disability, workers compensation,
and other benefits that apply to an officer, agent, or employee of a public
agency while performing functions within the territorial limits of the public
agency apply to the same degree and extent when the officer, agent, or
employee performs functions or duties under the agreement outside the
territorial limits of that public agency.
